North Carolina statutes. Chapter 157. Housing Authorities and Projects.
Article 1. Housing Authorities Law.

§ 157-1.
Title of Article.

This Article may be referred to as the Housing Authorities Law.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this Article, see 19 N.C.L. Rev. 484 (1941).

For comment on the public purpose doctrine, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 37 (1967).

For comment on eviction in public housing, see 4 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 112 (1968).

For comment, “Urban Planning and Land Use Regulation: The Need for Consistency,” see 14 Wake Forest L. Rev. 81 (1978).

For note, “New Developments for Federally Subsidized Housing Tenants in North Carolina,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1455 (1986).

For article, “Their Home is not Their Castle: Subsidized Housing’s Intrusion Into Family Privacy and Decisional Autonomy,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 869 (2021).

§ 157-2.
Finding and declaration of necessity.

It is hereby declared that unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in urban and rural areas throughout the State and that such unsafe or unsanitary conditions arise from overcrowding and concentration of population, the obsolete and poor condition of the buildings, improper planning, excessive land coverage, lack of proper light, air and space, unsanitary design and arrangement, lack of proper sanitary facilities, and the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; that in such urban and rural areas many persons of low income are forced to reside in unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations; that in such urban and rural areas there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations available to all the inhabitants thereof and that consequently many persons of low income are forced to occupy overcrowded and congested dwelling accommodations; that these conditions cause an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the health, safety, morals and welfare of the citizens of the State and impair economic values; that these conditions cannot be remedied by the ordinary operation of private enterprise; that the clearance, replanning and reconstruction of such areas and the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired; that it is in the public interest that work on such projects be instituted as soon as possible; and that the necessity for the provisions hereinafter enacted is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination to be in the public interest.

It is hereby further declared that there is a serious shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing in North Carolina that can be afforded by persons and families of moderate income; that it is in the best interest of the State to encourage programs to provide housing for such persons without imposing on them undue financial hardship; and that in undertaking such programs a housing authority is promoting the health, welfare and prosperity of all citizens of the State and is serving a public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

History.

1985, c. 456, s. 2; 1938, Ex. Sess., c. 2, s. 14; 1941, c. 78, s. 2; 1987, c. 464, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Searching Everywhere for a Section 24(1)(A) Standard:
City of Asheville, Town of Boone, and the Unclear Future of Local-State Relations in North Carolina,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 1882 (2018).

§ 157-3.
Definitions.

The following terms, wherever used or referred to in this Article shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Authority” or “housing authority” shall mean a public body and a body corporate and politic organized in accordance with the provisions of this Article for the purposes, with the powers and subject to the restrictions hereinafter set forth.

“Bonds” shall mean any bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness issued pursuant to this Article.

“City” shall mean any city or town having a population of more than 500 inhabitants according to the last federal census or any revision or amendment thereto.

“City clerk” and “mayor” shall mean the clerk and mayor, respectively, of the city or the officers thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the clerk and mayor respectively.

“Commissioner” shall mean one of the members of an authority appointed in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

“Community facilities” shall include real and personal property, and buildings and equipment for recreational or social assemblies, for educational, health or welfare purposes and necessary utilities, when designed primarily for the benefit and use of the housing authority and/or the occupants of the dwelling accommodation.

“Contract” shall mean any agreement of an authority with or for the benefit of an obligee whether contained in a resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, bond or other instrument.

“Council” shall mean the legislative body, council, board of commissioners, board of trustees, or other body charged with governing the city.

“Farmers of low income” shall mean persons or families who at the time of their admission to occupancy in a dwelling of the authority:

Live under unsafe or unsanitary housing conditions;

Derive their principal income from operating or working upon a farm; and

Had an aggregate average annual net income for the three years preceding their admission that was less than the amount that shall be determined by the authority to be necessary, within its area of operation, to enable them, without financial assistance, to obtain decent, safe and sanitary housing, without overcrowding.

“Federal government” shall include the United States of America, the Federal Emergency Administration of Public Works or any agency, instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Government” shall include the State and federal governments and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

“Housing project” shall include all real and personal property, buildings and improvements, stores, offices, lands for farming and gardening, and community facilities acquired or constructed or to be acquired or constructed pursuant to a single plan or undertaking:

To demolish, clear, remove, alter or repair unsanitary or unsafe housing; and/or

To provide safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income, or moderate income, or low and moderate income; and/or

To provide safe and sanitary housing for persons of low income, through payment of rent subsidies from any source; and/or

To provide grants, loans, interest supplements and other programs of financial assistance (including rent subsidies in furtherance of a program of home ownership) to persons of low income, or moderate income, or low and moderate income, so that such persons may become owners of their own housing or rehabilitate their own housing; and/or

To provide grants, loans, interest supplements and other programs of financial assistance to public or private developers of housing for persons of low income, or moderate income, or low and moderate income.“Housing project” also includes any project that provides housing for persons of other than low or moderate income, as long as at least twenty percent (20%) of the units in the project are set aside for the exclusive use of persons of low income.The term “housing project” may also be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration and repair of the improvements and all other work in connection therewith.

“Mortgage” shall include deeds of trust, mortgages, building and loan contracts or other instruments conveying real or personal property as security for bonds and conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

“Municipality” shall mean any city, town, incorporated village or other municipality in the State.

“Obligee of the authority” or “obligee” shall include any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, any lessor demising property to the authority used in connection with a housing project or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the United States of America, when it is a party to any contract with the authority.

(15a)

“Persons of low income” means persons in households the annual income of which, adjusted for family size, is not more than sixty percent (60%) of the local area median family income as defined by the most recent figures published by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(15b)

“Persons of moderate income” means persons deemed by the authority to require the assistance made available pursuant to this Chapter on account of insufficient personal or family income taking into consideration, without limitation, (i) the amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs, (ii) the size of the person’s family, (iii) the cost and condition of housing facilities available, and (iv) the eligibility of such persons and families for federal housing assistance of any type predicated upon a moderate or low and moderate income basis.

“Real property” shall include lands, lands under water, structures, and any and all easements, franchises and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise.

“State” shall mean the State of North Carolina.

“Trust indenture” shall include instruments pledging the revenues of real or personal properties but not conveying such properties or conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 3; 1938, Ex. Sess., c. 2, s. 14; 1941, c. 78, s. 2; 1943, c. 636, s. 1; 1959, cc. 321, 641, 1281; 1961, c. 200, s. 1; 1977, c. 924; 1987, c. 464, ss. 2, 3.

§ 157-4.
Notice, hearing and creation of authority; cancellation of certificate of incorporation.

Any 25 residents of a city and of the area within 10 miles from the territorial boundaries thereof may file a petition with the city clerk setting forth that there is a need for an authority to function in the city and said surrounding area. Upon the filing of such a petition the city clerk shall give notice of the time, place and purposes of a public hearing at which the council will determine the need for an authority in the city and said surrounding area. Such notice shall be given at the city’s expense by publishing a notice, at least 10 days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the city and said surrounding area, or, if there be no such newspaper, by posting such notice in at least three public places within the city, at least 10 days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held.

Upon the date fixed for said hearing held upon notice as provided herein, an opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents and taxpayers of the city and said surrounding area and to all other interested persons. After such a hearing, the council shall determine:

Whether insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in the city and said surrounding area, and/or

Whether there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in the city and said surrounding area available for all the inhabitants thereof.

In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or insanitary, the council shall take into consideration the following: the physical condition and age of the buildings; the degree of overcrowding; the percentage of land coverage; the light and air available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations; the size and arrangement of the rooms; the sanitary facilities; and the extent to which conditions exist in such buildings which endanger life or property by fire or other causes.

If it shall determine that either or both of the above enumerated conditions exist, the council shall adopt a resolution so finding (which need not go into any detail other than the mere finding) and shall cause notice of such determination to be given to the mayor who shall thereupon appoint, as hereinafter provided, not less than five nor more than nine commissioners to act as an authority. Said commission shall be a public body and a body corporate and politic upon the completion of the taking of the following proceedings:

The commissioners shall present to the Secretary of State an application signed by them, which shall set forth (without any detail other than the mere recital):

(1)

That a notice has been given and public hearing has been held as aforesaid, that the council made the aforesaid determination after such hearing, and that the mayor has appointed them as commissioners;

(2)

The name and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office, the date and place of induction into and taking oath of office, and that they desire the housing authority to become a public body and a body corporate and politic under this Article;

The term of office of each of the commissioners;

The name which is proposed for the corporation; and

The location of the principal office of the proposed corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of said commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of the State to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as asserted in the application, and that each subscribed and swore thereto in the officer’s presence. The Secretary of State shall examine the application and if he finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation of this State or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty he shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in his office.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the authority shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application; the Secretary of State shall make and issue to the said commissioners a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this Article, under the seal of the State, and shall record the same with the application.

If the council, after a hearing as aforesaid, shall determine that neither of the above enumerated conditions exist, it shall adopt a resolution denying the petition. After three months shall have expired from the date of the denial of any such petitions, subsequent petitions may be filed as aforesaid and new hearings and determinations made thereon.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this Article upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.

The Secretary of State is authorized and empowered to revoke or to cancel a certificate of incorporation previously issued to an authority or housing authority upon filing in his office a petition and resolution of the council and a petition and resolution of the authority and its members requesting such revocation or cancellation and when the Secretary of State is satisfied that no indebtedness has been incurred or property acquired by said housing authority.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 4; 1943, c. 636, s. 7; 1961, c. 987; 1971, c. 362, s. 1; c. 599.

Local Modification.

City of Durham: 1971, c. 575.

§ 157-4.1.
Alternative organization — any city.

In lieu of creating a housing authority as authorized herein, the council of any city may, if it deems wise, either designate a redevelopment commission created under the provisions of Chapter 160 of the General Statutes to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority as prescribed herein, or may itself exercise such powers, duties, and responsibilities. Any such designation shall be by passage of a resolution adopted in accordance with the procedure and pursuant to the finding specified in the first and second paragraphs of

G.S. 157-4

. In the event the council of any city designates itself to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, then where any act, proceeding, or approval is required to be done, recommended, or approved both by a housing authority and by the council of the city, then the performance, recommendation, or approval thereof once by the council of the city shall be sufficient to make such performance, recommendation, or approval valid and legal. In the event the council of the city designates itself to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, it may assign the administration of the housing programs, projects, and policies to any existing or new department of the city.

The council of any city which has prior to July 1, 1969, created, or which may hereafter create, a housing authority may, in its discretion, by resolution abolish such housing authority, such abolition to be effective on a day set in such resolution not less than 90 days after its adoption. Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the housing authority of the city is hereby authorized and directed to take such actions and to execute such documents as will carry into effect the provisions and the intent of the resolution, and as will effectively transfer its authority, responsibilities, obligations, personnel, and property, both real and personal, to the city. Any city which abolishes a housing authority pursuant to this subsection may, at any time subsequent to such abolition or concurrently therewith, exercise the authority granted by subsection (a) of this section.On the day set in the resolution of the council:

The housing authority shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate and as a public body;

All property, real and personal and mixed, belonging to the housing authority shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of the city;

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of the housing authority shall remain, vest in, and inure to the benefit of the city;

All rentals, taxes, assessments, and any other funds, charges or fees, owing to the housing authority shall be owed to and collected by the city;

Any actions, suits, and proceedings, pending against, or having been instituted by the housing authority shall not be abated by such abolition, but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if abolition had not occurred, and the city shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead if the housing authority and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgments rendered against the housing authority in any such actions, suits, or proceedings, and no new process need be served in any such action, suit, or proceeding;

All obligations of the housing authority, including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by the city, and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall be constituted obligations and indebtedness of the city;

All ordinances, rules, regulations and policies of the housing authority shall continue in full force and effect until repealed or amended by the council of the city.

Where the governing body of any municipality has in its discretion, by resolution abolished a housing authority, pursuant to subsection (b) above, the governing body of such municipality may, at any time subsequent to the passage of a resolution abolishing a housing authority, or concurrently therewith, by the passage of a resolution adopted in accordance with the procedures and pursuant to the finding specified in

G.S. 157-4.1

, designate an existing redevelopment commission created pursuant to Article 37 of Chapter 160 of the General Statutes, to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority. Where the governing body of any municipality designates, pursuant to this subsection, an existing redevelopment commission created pursuant to Article 37 of Chapter 160 of the General Statutes to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, on the day set in the resolution of the governing body passed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, or pursuant to subsection (c) of this section:

The housing authority shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate and as a public body;

All property, real and personal and mixed, belonging to the housing authority or to the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality;

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of the housing authority or in favor of the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall remain, vest in, and inure to the benefit of the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality;

All rentals, taxes, assessments, and any other funds, charges, or fees owing to the housing authority or owing to the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall be owed to and collected by the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality;

Any actions, suits, and proceedings pending against or having been instituted by the housing authority or the municipality, or to which the municipality has become a party as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall not be abated by such abolition but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if abolition had not occurred, and the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead of the housing authority or the municipality, and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgments rendered in such actions, suits, or proceedings, and no new processes need be served in such action, suit, or proceeding;

All obligations of the housing authority or the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality; and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall be constituted obligations and indebtedness of the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality;

All ordinances, rules, regulations, and policies of the housing authority or the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall continue in full force and effect until repealed and amended by the existing redevelopment commission of the municipality.

A redevelopment commission designated by the governing body of any municipality to exercise the powers, duties and responsibilities of a housing authority shall, when exercising the same, do so in accordance with Chapter 157 of the General Statutes. Otherwise the redevelopment commission shall continue to exercise the powers, duties and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission in accordance with Article 37 of Chapter 160 of the General Statutes.

History.

1969, c. 1217, s. 2; 1971, c. 116, ss. 3, 4.

§ 157-4.1A.
Alternative organization — cities under 250,000 only.

In lieu of creating a housing authority as authorized herein, the council of any city may, if it deems wise, designate a redevelopment commission created under the provisions of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or a regional council of government created pursuant to Part 2 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority as prescribed herein, or may itself exercise such powers, duties, and responsibilities. Any such designation shall be by passage of a resolution adopted in accordance with the procedure and pursuant to the finding specified in the first and second paragraphs of

G.S. 157-4

. In the event the council of any city designates itself to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, then where any act, proceeding, or approval is required to be done, recommended, or approved both by a housing authority and by the council of the city, then the performance, recommendation, or approval thereof once by the council of the city shall be sufficient to make such performance, recommendation, or approval valid and legal. In the event the council of the city designates itself to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, it may assign the administration of the housing programs, projects, and policies to any existing or new department of the city.

The council of any city which has prior to July 1, 1969, created, or which may hereafter create, a housing authority may, in its discretion, by resolution abolish such housing authority, such abolition to be effective on a day set in such resolution that will allow sufficient time to wind down the operations of the housing authority. Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the housing authority of the city is hereby authorized and directed to take such actions and to execute such documents as will carry into effect the provisions and the intent of the resolution, and as will effectively transfer its authority, responsibilities, obligations, personnel, and property, both real and personal, to the city. Any city which abolishes a housing authority pursuant to this subsection may, at any time subsequent to such abolition or concurrently therewith, exercise the authority granted by subsection (a) of this section.On the day set in the resolution of the council, all of the following apply:

The housing authority shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate and as a public body.

All property, real and personal and mixed, belonging to the housing authority shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of the city.

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of the housing authority shall remain, vest in, and inure to the benefit of the city.

All rentals, taxes, assessments, and any other funds, charges or fees, owing to the housing authority shall be owed to and collected by the city.

Any actions, suits, and proceedings, pending against, or having been instituted by the housing authority shall not be abated by such abolition, but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if abolition had not occurred, and the city shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead if the housing authority and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgments rendered against the housing authority in any such actions, suits, or proceedings, and no new process need be served in any such action, suit, or proceeding.

All obligations of the housing authority, including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by the city, and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall be constituted obligations and indebtedness of the city.

All ordinances, rules, regulations and policies of the housing authority shall continue in full force and effect until repealed or amended by the council of the city.

Where the governing body of any municipality has in its discretion, by resolution abolished a housing authority, pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the governing body of such municipality may, at any time subsequent to the passage of a resolution abolishing a housing authority, or concurrently therewith, by the passage of a resolution adopted in accordance with the procedures and pursuant to the finding specified in

G.S. 157-4.1

, designate an existing redevelopment commission created pursuant to Article 22 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or a regional council of government created pursuant to Part 2 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority. Where the governing body of any municipality designates, pursuant to this subsection, an existing redevelopment commission or a regional council of government to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, on the day set in the resolution of the governing body passed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, or pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, all of the following apply:

The housing authority shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate and as a public body.

All property, real and personal and mixed, belonging to the housing authority or to the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government.

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of the housing authority or in favor of the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall remain, vest in, and inure to the benefit of the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government.

All rentals, taxes, assessments, and any other funds, charges, or fees owing to the housing authority or owing to the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall be owed to and collected by the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government.

Any actions, suits, and proceedings pending against or having been instituted by the housing authority or the municipality, or to which the municipality has become a party as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall not be abated by such abolition but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if abolition had not occurred, and the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead of the housing authority or the municipality, and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgments rendered in such actions, suits, or proceedings, and no new processes need be served in such action, suit, or proceeding.

All obligations of the housing authority or the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government; and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall be constituted obligations and indebtedness of the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government.

All rules, regulations, and policies of the housing authority as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall continue in full force and effect until repealed and amended by the existing redevelopment commission or regional council of government.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 157-5

and

G.S. 157-8

, the term of office for all commissioners shall expire.

A redevelopment commission or regional council of government designated by the governing body of any municipality to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority shall, when exercising the same, do so in accordance with Chapter 157 of the General Statutes. Otherwise, the redevelopment commission shall continue to exercise its powers, duties, and responsibilities in accordance with Article 22 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, and the regional council of governments shall continue to exercise its powers, duties, and responsibilities in accordance with Part 2 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.

Upon passage of a resolution pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section, the city council may appoint an interim executive director who will work with the housing authority to facilitate any transfer to the city, redevelopment commission, or regional council of government, and who will serve in that capacity until the transfer is complete. The interim executive director shall have all the powers and duties granted to an executive director pursuant to

G.S. 157-5(e)

along with the rules, regulations, and policies of the housing authority.

This section does not apply to cities with a population of greater than 250,000 according to the latest federal decennial census.

History.

1969, c. 1217, s. 2; 1971, c. 116, ss. 3, 4; 2017-178, ss. 1, 3.

§ 157-4.2.
Authority budgeting and accounting systems as a part of city or county budgeting and accounting systems.

The council of a city or the board of commissioners of a county may by resolution provide that the budgeting and accounting systems of the city’s or county’s housing authority (or, if the city’s redevelopment commission is exercising the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a housing authority, the budgeting and accounting systems of the redevelopment commission) shall be an integral part of the budgeting and accounting systems of the city or county. If such a resolution is adopted:

For purposes of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, the authority (or commission) shall not be considered a “public authority,” as that phrase is defined in G.S. 159-7(b), but rather shall be considered a department or agency of the city or county. The operations of the authority (or commission) shall be budgeted and accounted for as if the operations were those of a public enterprise of the city or county.

The budget of the authority (or commission) shall be prepared and submitted in the same manner and according to the same procedures as are the budgets of other departments and agencies of the city or county; and the budget ordinance of the city or county shall provide for the operations of the authority (or commission).

The budget officer and finance officer of the city or county shall administer and control that portion of the city or county budget ordinance relating to the operations of the authority (or commission).

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 37.1; 1973, c. 474, s. 29.

§ 157-5.
Appointment, qualifications and tenure of commissioners.

An authority shall consist of not less than five nor more than eleven commissioners appointed by the mayor and the mayor shall designate the first chair. No commissioner may be a city official. At least one of the commissioners appointed shall be a person who is directly assisted by the public housing authority. However, there shall be no requirement to appoint such a person if the authority: (i) operates less than 300 public housing units, (ii) provides reasonable notice to the resident advisory board of the opportunity for at least one person who is directly assisted by the authority to serve as a commissioner, and (iii) within a reasonable time after receipt of the notice by the resident advisory board, has not been notified of the intention of any such person to serve. The mayor shall appoint the person directly assisted by the authority unless the authority’s rules require that the person be elected by other persons who are directly assisted by the authority. If the commissioner directly assisted by the public housing authority ceases to receive such assistance, the commissioner’s office shall be abolished and another person who is directly assisted by the public housing authority shall be appointed by the mayor.

No commissioner who is also a person directly assisted by the public housing authority shall be qualified to vote on matters affecting his or her official conduct or matters affecting his or her own individual tenancy, as distinguished from matters affecting tenants in general. No more than one third of the members of any housing authority commission shall be tenants of the authority or recipients of housing assistance through any program operated by the authority.

The council may at any time by resolution or ordinance increase or decrease the membership of an authority, within the limitations herein prescribed.

The mayor shall designate overlapping terms of not less than one nor more than five years for the commissioners first appointed. Thereafter, the term of office shall be five years. A commissioner shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum. The mayor shall file with the city clerk a certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his or her services but he or she shall be entitled to the necessary expenses including traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her duties.

When the office of the first chair of the authority becomes vacant, the authority shall select a chair from among its members. An authority shall select from among its members a vice-chair, and it may employ a secretary (who shall be executive director), technical experts and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. An authority may call upon the corporation counsel or chief law officer of the city for such legal services as it may require or it may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such powers or duties as it may deem proper.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 5; 1971, c. 362, ss. 2-5; 1981, c. 864; 1999-146, s. 1.

Local Modification.

City of Asheville: 2007-239, s. 1; city of Charlotte: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 835; city of Durham: 1971, c. 575; city of Greensboro: 1971, c. 573; city of Greenville: 2009-211, s. 1; city of Washington: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 693, s. 1; city of Wilson: 1953, c. 664.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Expanding the Role of North Carolina State Courts in Resolving Public Housing Disputes,” see 33 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 40 (2010).

§ 157-6.
Duty of authority.

The authority shall be under a statutory duty to comply or to cause compliance strictly with all provisions of this Article and the laws of the State and in addition thereto, with each and every term, provision and covenant in any contract of the authority on its part to be kept or performed.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 6; 1997-455, s. 1.

Local Modification.

City of Washington: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 615, s. 1; Washington Housing Authority: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 615, s. 1.

§ 157-7.
Interested commissioners or employees.

No commissioner or employee of an authority shall acquire any interest direct or indirect in any housing project or in any property included or planned to be included in any project, nor shall he have any interest direct or indirect in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any housing project. If any commissioner or employee of an authority owns or controls an interest direct or indirect in any property included or planned to be included in any housing project, he shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the authority and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to so disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office.

History.

1935, c. 456, s. 7.